src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_N_INDEP_gwekishin_gt-norm.yaml
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiwag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+4: gigwekishinsiiman
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiidigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiidigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinsiibanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiibanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiigobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiigobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiidigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiidigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinsiibanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiibanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiigobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiigobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmindigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmindigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinminbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinminbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmingobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmingobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmwdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmwdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinmwbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinmwbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmwgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmwgobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinwdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinwdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinwbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinwbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinwgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinwgobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinmbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinmbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinmgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinmgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmindigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmindigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinminbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinminbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmingobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmingobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmwdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmwdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinmwbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinmwbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmwgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmwgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinwdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinwdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinwbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinwbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinwgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinwgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinmbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinmbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinmgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinmgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimindigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimindigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: gwekishinsiiminbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiminbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimingobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimingobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimwdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimwdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: gwekishinsiimwbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimwbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimwgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimwgobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiiwdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiwdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: gwekishinsiiwbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiwbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiiwgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiiwgobanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimdigan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimdigag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: gwekishinsiimbanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimbanag
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: gwekishinsiimgobanan
     gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gwekishinsiimgobanag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimindigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimindigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinsiiminbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiminbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimingobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimingobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimwdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimwdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinsiimwbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimwbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimwgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimwgobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiiwdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiwdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinsiiwbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiwbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiiwgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiiwgobanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimdigan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimdigag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: nigwekishinsiimbanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimbanag
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: nigwekishinsiimgobanan
     1+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: nigwekishinsiimgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimindigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimindigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinsiiminbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiminbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimingobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+1+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimingobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimwdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimwdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinsiimwbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimwbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimwgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+2+Pl+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimwgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiiwdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiwdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinsiiwbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiwbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiiwgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+3+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiiwgobanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimdigan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimdigag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+4: gigwekishinsiimbanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimbanag
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+4: gigwekishinsiimgobanan
     2+gwekishin+VAI+Neg+X+Prt+Dub+3+Pl: gigwekishinsiimgobanag
     
